da: Erhverv og industri > Landbrug > Husdyrbrug > Biavl > Udstyr til biavl: Beskyttelsesudstyr til biavl; Udstyr til udvinding af honning
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Agricultura > Pecuária > Apicultura > Equipamentos para apicultura: Equipamentos de proteção para apicultura; Equipamentos para extração de mel
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 農業 > 畜牧業 > 養蜂業 > 養蜂設備: 養蜂防護裝備; 蜂蜜提取設備
en: Business & Industrial > Agriculture > Animal Husbandry > Beekeeping > Beekeeping Equipment: Beekeeping Protective Gear; Honey Extraction Equipment
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zemědělství > Zootechnika > Včelařství > Včelařské vybavení: Včelařské ochranné pomůcky; Vybavení na extrakci medu
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Rolnictwo > Hodowla zwierząt > Pszczelarstwo > Sprzęt pszczelarski: Sprzęt ochronny dla pszczelarzy; Sprzęt do ekstrakcji miodu
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Γεωργία > Κτηνοτροφία > Μελισσοκομία > Εξοπλισμός μελισσοκομίας: Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός μελισσοκομίας; Εξοπλισμός εξαγωγής μελιού
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เกษตรกรรม > การเลี้ยงสัตว์ > การเลี้ยงผึ้ง > อุปกรณ์เลี้ยงผึ้ง: อุปกรณ์ป้องกันการเลี้ยงผึ้ง; อุปกรณ์สกัดน้ำผึ้ง
es: Economía e industria > Agricultura > Cría de animales > Apicultura > Equipo de apicultura: Equipo de protección para la apicultura; Equipo de extracción de miel
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Agricultura > Criação de animais > Apicultura > Equipamento para apicultura: Equipamento de proteção para apicultura; Equipamento para extração de mel
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Poljoprivreda > Stočarstvo > Pčelarstvo > Oprema za pčelarstvo: Zaštitna oprema za pčelarstvo; Oprema za vađenje meda
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Žemės ūkis > Gyvulininkystė > Bitininkystė > Bitininkystės įranga: Apsauginės priemonės bitininkams; Medaus gavybos įranga
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Agrarische sector > Veeteelt > Bijenteelt > Bijenteeltuitrusting: Beschermende uitrusting voor bijenteelt; Honingextractieapparatuur
sv: Företag och industri > Jordbruk > Boskapsskötsel > Biodling > Biodlingsutrustning: Skyddsutrustning för biodling; Utrustning för honungsutvinning
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Nông nghiệp > Chăn nuôi > Nuôi ong > Thiết bị nuôi ong: Đồ bảo hộ nuôi ong; Thiết bị chiết xuất mật ong
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 農業 > 畜産 > 養蜂 > 養蜂用具: 養蜂用防護具; 蜂蜜抽出器
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Kmetijstvo > Živinoreja > Čebelarstvo > Čebelarska oprema: Zaščitna oprema za čebelarstvo; Oprema za točenje medu
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Poľnohospodárstvo > Chov zvierat > Včelárstvo > Včelárske vybavenie: Včelárske ochranné pomôcky; Zariadenia na získavanie medu
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Maatalous > Karjatalous > Mehiläistenhoito > Mehiläistenhoitovarusteet: Mehiläistenhoidon suojavarusteet; Hunajan talteenottovälineet
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Agriculture > Élevage > Apiculture > Matériel d’apiculture: Équipement de protection pour l’apiculture; Équipement d’extraction du miel
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Селско стопанство > Животновъдство > Пчеларство > Оборудване за пчеларство: Защитна екипировка за пчеларство; Оборудване за екстракция на мед
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 농업 > 축산업 > 양봉 > 양봉 장비: 양봉 보호 장비; 꿀 추출 장비
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Mezőgazdaság > Állattenyésztés > Méhészet > Méhészeti felszerelések: Méhészeti védőfelszerelés; Mézkivonó berendezések
it: Commercio e industria > Agricoltura > Zootecnia > Apicoltura > Attrezzatura per l'apicoltura: Attrezzatura protettiva per l'apicoltura; Attrezzatura per l'estrazione del miele
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Agricultură > Creșterea animalelor > Apicultură > Echipament apicole: Echipament de protecție pentru apicultură; Echipament de extracție a mierii
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Tarım > Hayvancılık > Arıcılık > Arıcılık Ekipmanları: Arıcılık Koruyucu Giysileri; Bal Süzme Ekipmanları
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 农/畜牧/渔业专用设备 > 畜牧业 > 养蜂业 > 养蜂设备: 养蜂防护装备; 蜂蜜提取设备
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Landwirtschaft > Viehhaltung > Bienenzucht > Bienenzuchtausrüstung: Bienenzuchtschutzausrüstung; Honiggewinnungsgeräte
nb: Forretninger og industri > Jordbruk > Husdyrhold > Birøkt > Birøkterutstyr: Beskyttelsesutstyr for birøkt; Utstyr for honningutvinning
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Сельское хозяйство > Животноводство > Пчеловодство > Оборудование для пчеловодства: Защитная экипировка для пчеловодства; Оборудование для откачки меда